Washington statutes.
RCW 39.96.080

Authority cumulative.

The powers conferred by this chapter are in addition to, and not in substitution for, the powers conferred by any existing law, and the limitations imposed by this chapter do not directly or indirectly modify, limit, or affect the powers conferred by any existing law.

[ 1993 c 273 s 8.]